Idaho, session 2026, S1422.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 74, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 3, Title 74, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 3
CAMPAIGN FINANCE TRANSPARENCY
SECTION 2. That Chapter 3, Title 74, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW PART, to be known and desig-
nated as Part 1, Chapter 3, Title 74, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
PART 1
PROVISIONS OF GENERAL APPLICATION
74-3-101. PURPOSE OF CHAPTER. The purpose of this chapter is:
(1) To promote openness and public confidence in government; and
(2) To promote transparency by those giving financial support to elec-
tion campaigns and to persons advocating for or against candidates or ballot
measures.
74-3-102. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter, the following terms
have the following meanings:
(1) "Candidate" means an individual who seeks nomination, election,
or reelection to public office in Idaho and includes individuals seeking
statewide, judicial, legislative, or local government office. For the
purposes of this chapter, "candidate" does not include individuals seek-
ing nomination, election, or reelection to federal office or the office of
precinct committeeman.
(2) "Contribution" includes any advance, conveyance, forgiveness of
indebtedness, deposit, distribution, loan, gift, pledge, subscription, or
transfer of money or anything of value, any contract, agreement, and promise
or other obligation, whether or not legally enforceable, and any payment,


whether by cash, check, or electronic transfer, to make a contribution in
support of or in opposition to any candidate, political action committee,
or measure. Such term also includes personal funds or other property of a
candidate or members of his household expended or transferred to cover ex-
penditures incurred in support of such candidate but does not include per-
sonal funds used to pay the candidate filing fee. Such term also includes
the rendering of personal and professional services for less than full con-
sideration but does not include ordinary home hospitality or the rendering
of part-time services of the sort commonly performed by volunteer campaign
workers or advisors or incidental expenses not in excess of twenty-five dol-
lars ($25.00) personally paid for by any volunteer campaign worker. "Part-
time services," for the purposes of this definition, means services in addi-
tion to regular full-time employment, or, in the case of an unemployed person
or persons engaged in part-time employment, services rendered without com-
pensation or reimbursement of expenses from any source other than the candi-
date or political action committee for whom such services are rendered. For
the purposes of this chapter, contributions other than money or its equiva-
lent shall be deemed to have a monetary value equivalent to the fair market
value of the contribution.
(3) "Earmark" or "earmarked" means a designation, instruction, or en-
cumbrance, whether directly or indirectly, express or implied, oral or writ-
ten, that results in all or any part of a contribution being used to make
a contribution, independent expenditure, electioneering communication, or
measure expenditure. A donor's authorization for a commercial payment pro-
cessor, whose usual and normal business is to process payments, to transmit
funds from the donor to a nonprofit corporation, association, or other or-
ganization in the commercial payment processor's ordinary course of busi-
ness does not in itself constitute an earmark.
(4) "Election" means any state or local general, special, recall, or
primary election.
(5) "Election campaign" means any campaign in support of or in opposi-
tion to a candidate for election to public office and any campaign in support
of or in opposition to a measure.
(6)(a) "Electioneering communication" means any paid public communi-
cation that:
(i) Unambiguously refers to any candidate;
(ii) Is broadcast, printed, mailed, delivered, made, dis-
tributed, or disseminated to a recipient by telephone, in a digi-
tal format online, or by other electronic means during the thirty
(30) day period before a primary election or the sixty (60) day
period before a general election; and
(iii) Is directed to an audience that includes members of the elec-
torate for the candidate's public office.
(b) An electioneering communication does not include:
(i) Any news articles, editorial endorsements, opinion or com-
mentary, writings, or letters to the editor printed in a newspa-
per, magazine, or other periodical not owned or controlled by a
candidate, political action committee, or political party;
(ii) Media appearances by a candidate on television, radio shows,
podcasts, or any other type of digital media not owned or con-


trolled by a candidate, political action committee, or political
party;
(iii) Any editorial endorsements or opinions aired by a broadcast
facility not owned or controlled by a candidate, political action
committee, or political party;
(iv) Any communication by persons made in the regular course and
scope of their business or any communication made by a membership
organization solely to members of such organization and their fam-
ilies;
(v) Any communication that refers to any candidate only as part of
the popular name of a bill or statute; or
(vi) A communication that constitutes an expenditure by a candi-
date or political action committee or an independent expenditure
that is otherwise reported under this chapter.
(7) "Employee" means an individual who performs a service for wages or
other compensation from which the individual's employer withholds federal
employment taxes under a contract for hire, written or oral.
(8) "Expenditure" includes any payment, contribution, subscription,
distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or anything of value
and includes a contract, promise, or agreement, whether or not legally en-
forceable, to make an expenditure. The term "expenditure" also includes a
promise to pay, a payment or a transfer of anything of value in exchange for
goods, services, property, facilities, or anything of value for the purpose
of assisting, benefiting, or honoring any public official or candidate, or
assisting in furthering or opposing any election campaign. For the purpose
of determining when an expenditure report should be filed under this chap-
ter, an expenditure is made on the day that the communication paid for with
the expenditure is publicly distributed or otherwise viewed by the public or
on the date payment is made, whichever is earlier.
(9)(a) "Independent expenditure" means any expenditure by a person
for a communication expressly advocating the election or defeat of a
clearly identified candidate that is not made in coordination with the
candidate.
(b) As used in this subsection, "expressly advocating" means any com-
munication containing a message advocating the election or defeat of a
candidate by using the name of the candidate and using phrases includ-
ing but not limited to "vote for," "elect," "support," "cast your ballot
for," "vote against," "defeat," or "reject."
(c) For the purpose of determining whether an expenditure is made in
coordination with a candidate or political action committee, the term
"coordination" means and includes but is not limited to an expenditure
made with the cooperation of, with the prior consent or knowledge of, in
consultation with, or at the request or suggestion of, or using nonpub-
lic information obtained from, a candidate or the candidate's agent or
paid or unpaid staff or volunteer, a person acting on behalf of a can-
didate, or a person acting as a conduit for messages to or from a candi-
date's campaign.
(10) "Indirectly" means making a contribution or payment to a person
with a designation, instruction, or encumbrance, whether direct or indi-
rect, express or implied, oral or written, or involving intermediaries or


conduits, that results in all or any part of the contribution or payment
being used to make a contribution to any candidate, political action com-
mittee, or measure or to make electioneering communications or independent
expenditures.
(11) "Local government office" means any publicly elected office for
any political subdivision of the state or special district that is not a leg-
islative, judicial, statewide, or federal office.
(12) "Measure" means any proposal submitted to the people for their ap-
proval or rejection at a statewide or local election, including any initia-
tive, referendum, recall election, or revision of or amendment to the state
constitution. An initiative or referendum proposal shall be deemed a mea-
sure when the attorney general, county prosecutor, or city attorney, as ap-
propriate, reviews it and gives it a ballot title. A recall shall be deemed
a measure upon approval of the recall petition as to form pursuant to section
34-1704, Idaho Code.
(13)(a) "Measure expenditure" means any expenditure by a person for a
communication expressly advocating the passage or defeat of a clearly
identified measure.
(b) As used in this subsection, "expressly advocating" means any com-
munication containing a message advocating the passage or defeat of a
measure by using the name of the measure and using phrases including
but not limited to "vote for," "support," "cast your ballot for," "vote
against," "defeat," or "reject."
(14) "Person" means an individual, corporation, association, firm,
partnership, committee, political party, club, or other organization or
group of persons.
(15) "Political action committee" means:
(a) Any person specifically designated to support or oppose any candi-
date or measure; or
(b) Any person who receives contributions and makes expenditures in an
amount exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) in any calendar year for
the purpose of supporting or opposing one (1) or more candidates or mea-
sures.
(16) "Political treasurer" means an individual appointed by a candidate
as provided in section 74-3-202, Idaho Code, or by a political action commit-
tee as provided in section 74-3-302, Idaho Code.
(17) "Public office" means any local, legislative, judicial, or state
office or position that is filled by election but does not include the office
of precinct committeeman.
74-3-103. FOREIGN CONTRIBUTIONS, FOREIGN INDEPENDENT EXPENDITURES,
AND FOREIGN ELECTIONEERING COMMUNICATIONS PROHIBITED. (1) A foreign na-
tional shall not make a contribution, directly or indirectly, to any
candidate, political action committee, or measure or make electioneering
communications or independent expenditures.
(2) As used in this section, "foreign national" means:
(a) An individual who is not a citizen of the United States and is not
lawfully admitted for permanent residence;
(b) A government or subdivision of a foreign country;
(c) A foreign political party; or


(d) Any entity, such as a partnership, association, corporation, or-
ganization, union, or other combination of persons, that is organized
under the laws of or has its principal place of business in a foreign
country.
(3) A violation of the provisions of this section shall be prosecuted
and punished as provided in part 5 of this chapter. However, any person who
knowingly and willfully violates the provisions of this section is guilty of
a felony when:
(a) The aggregate amount of contributions, independent expenditures,
or cost of electioneering communications made in violation of this sec-
tion exceeds one thousand dollars ($1,000) in a consecutive twelve (12)
month period; or
(b) The person pleads guilty to or is found guilty of a knowing and will-
ful violation of the provisions of this section for a second time within
ten (10) years, notwithstanding the form of the judgment or withheld
judgment.
(4) If any provision of this section or its application to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the section or the applica-
tion of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.
74-3-104. COMMERCIAL RECORDKEEPING. Each newspaper, periodical,
broadcasting station, direct mailing company, printer, and advertising
agency shall keep a current record of any and all obligations incurred by
a candidate or political action committee and payments made by a candidate
or political action committee. Such records shall be made available for
inspection upon request by the secretary of state. Failure to make such
records available shall result in a civil fine not to exceed one thousand
dollars ($1,000).
74-3-105. REPORTS TO BE CERTIFIED. All reports required to be filed
with the secretary of state under this chapter shall be signed and certi-
fied as true and correct by the person required to file the same. Electronic
signatures and certifications shall be governed by the uniform electronic
transactions act, chapter 50, title 28, Idaho Code.
74-3-106. IDENTIFICATION OF SOURCE OF CONTRIBUTIONS AND EXPENDITURES
-- COMMUNICATIONS. (1) No contribution shall be made and no expenditure
shall be incurred, directly or indirectly, in a fictitious name, anony-
mously, or by one (1) person through an agent, relative, or other person in
such a manner as to conceal the identity of the source of the contribution.
(2)(a) To ensure the proper reporting and identification of the source
of expenditures, any public communication made that is reportable as an
expenditure under this chapter shall clearly state: "Paid for by [the
official name of the candidate, political action committee, or fil-
ing entity]" and shall further state the filing entity identification
number, if available, as registered or reported with the secretary of
state.
(b) The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to campaign mate-
rials that are being reused by any candidate who has run for public of-


fice prior to 2026, as long as the person responsible for such communi-
cations is clearly indicated on such communications.
(c) Failure to comply with the provisions of this section shall result
in a civil fine payable to the secretary of state in the amount of fifty
dollars ($50.00) plus five percent (5%) of the monetary value of the ex-
penditure being made, rounded up to the nearest whole number. The sec-
retary of state shall deposit any civil fines collected pursuant to this
section to the general fund.
74-3-107. PERSUASIVE POLL CONCERNING CANDIDATE OR MEASURE MUST IDEN-
TIFY PERSON OR ENTITY PAYING FOR POLL. (1) If a person, candidate, politi-
cal party, or political committee requests or compensates a person to con-
duct or cause to be conducted a persuasive poll by telephone concerning a
candidate or to produce automated or computerized messages by telephone to
conduct a persuasive poll concerning a candidate, the person conducting the
poll shall, at the end of the poll, disclose the name and telephone number
of the person, candidate, political party, or political committee that re-
quested or compensated the person for the poll.
(2) As used in this section, "persuasive poll" means the canvassing of
persons, by means other than an established method of scientific sampling,
by asking questions concerning a candidate that are designed to provide in-
formation to advocate for the election, approval, or defeat of a candidate or
measure. The term does not include a poll that is conducted only to measure
the public's opinion about or reaction to an issue, fact, or theme.
(3) A violation of the provisions of this section shall be punishable as
provided in part 5 of this chapter.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 3, Title 74, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW PART, to be known and desig-
nated as Part 2, Chapter 3, Title 74, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
PART 2
CANDIDATES
74-3-201. CANDIDATES FOR PUBLIC OFFICE -- ESTABLISHMENT OF CAMPAIGN
FINANCE ACCOUNT. (1) A candidate shall be subject to the requirements of this
chapter once the candidate has taken any of the following actions:
(a) Announced the individual's candidacy publicly;
(b) Established a campaign finance account with the secretary of
state's office;
(c) Received a contribution for the purpose of promoting the individ-
ual's candidacy for office; or
(d) Made an expenditure, contracted for services, or reserved space
with the intent of promoting the individual's candidacy for office.
(2) For purposes of this chapter, an incumbent shall be presumed to be
a candidate in the subsequent election for the incumbent's office until the
incumbent has failed to file for office by the statutory deadline.
(3) Each candidate shall establish a campaign finance account with the
secretary of state's office as prescribed by the secretary of state. The
candidate shall provide the full name and address of the candidate, the of-


fice being sought by the candidate, and the name and address of the candi-
date's political treasurer.
74-3-202. APPOINTMENT OF POLITICAL TREASURER FOR CANDIDATE. (1) Each
candidate shall appoint a political treasurer who is a registered elector of
this state. The candidate shall certify the full name and complete address
of the political treasurer to the secretary of state at the time the candi-
date establishes a campaign finance account with the secretary of state's
office or as soon thereafter as practicable.
(2) No contribution shall be received or expenditure made by or on be-
half of a candidate until a political treasurer has been appointed pursuant
to the provisions of this section. Contributions must be received and expen-
ditures must be made by or through the candidate's political treasurer.
(3) A candidate may appoint himself to serve as his own political trea-
surer.
(4) An individual may be appointed and serve as political treasurer for
more than one (1) candidate and political action committee.
(5) A candidate may remove his political treasurer. In the case of the
death, resignation, or removal of a political treasurer before all obliga-
tions of a political treasurer under this chapter have been met, the candi-
date shall appoint a successor political treasurer and certify the name and
address of the successor in the manner provided in the case of an original ap-
pointment.
74-3-203. DUTIES OF POLITICAL TREASURER FOR CANDIDATE. (1) The polit-
ical treasurer or candidate shall serve as the official point of contact for
the secretary of state for the candidate's campaign.
(2) The political treasurer for each candidate shall maintain at least
one (1) checking account with a financial institution. All moneys received
by the candidate's campaign shall be deposited in such account. The polit-
ical treasurer for each candidate shall keep detailed accounts of all con-
tributions received and all expenditures made by or on behalf of the candi-
date. The political treasurer shall keep the accounts current within seven
(7) days after the date of receiving a contribution or making an expenditure.
A candidate's campaign funds shall be segregated from, and may not be commin-
gled with, any other account. A candidate who loans his campaign his own per-
sonal funds must transfer those funds to his campaign account.
(3) The political treasurer shall be responsible for making and filing
all reports that are required of a candidate under this chapter. Accounts
kept by the political treasurer for a candidate are subject to inspection by
the office of the secretary of state in the case of an investigation pursuant
to section 74-3-501 or 74-3-502, Idaho Code.
(4) Accounts kept by a political treasurer shall be preserved by him for
at least one (1) year after the date of the election to which the accounts re-
fer or at least one (1) year after the date the last report is filed under sec-
tion 74-3-205, Idaho Code, whichever is later.
74-3-204. IDENTIFICATION OF SOURCE OF CONTRIBUTIONS AND EXPENDITURES
-- CANDIDATES. (1) No contribution shall be made and no expenditure shall be
incurred, directly or indirectly, in a fictitious name, anonymously, or by


any person through an agent, relative, or other person in such a manner as to
conceal the identity of the source of the contribution.
(2)(a) Any person who contributes to a candidate shall accompany the
contribution with a report of his full name and complete address.
(b) If a political treasurer is offered or receives contributions of
more than one hundred dollars ($100) in the aggregate from the same per-
son during a calendar year, and there is no report of the full name and
complete address of the person making the contribution, the contribu-
tion shall be returned to the contributor if his identity can be ascer-
tained. If the contributor's identity cannot be ascertained, the con-
tribution shall be transmitted immediately by the political treasurer
to the secretary of state, who shall transmit it to the state controller
for deposit in the general fund.
(3) Contributions shall not be obtained for a candidate's campaign by
use of coercion or physical force, by making a contribution a condition of
employment or membership, or by using or threatening to use job discrimina-
tion or financial reprisals. A violation of the provisions of this section
shall be punishable as provided in part 5 of this chapter.
74-3-205. REPORTS OF CONTRIBUTIONS TO AND EXPENDITURES BY CANDI-
DATES. (1) The political treasurer for each candidate shall file with the
secretary of state a report of all contributions received and all expen-
ditures and encumbrances made by or on behalf of the candidate during the
reporting period, beginning with the month in which the first contribution,
expenditure, or encumbrance took place. The report shall itemize each
contribution received and each expenditure or encumbrance made during the
reporting period and shall include the following:
(a) Under contributions, the report shall include a list of all the con-
tributions received, including any funds or property of the candidate
used to cover expenditures. The report shall list the full name and com-
plete address of each person who contributed an aggregate amount of more
than one hundred dollars ($100) and the amount contributed by that per-
son. The report may list as a single item the total amount of contribu-
tions of one hundred dollars ($100) or less; and
(b) Under expenditures, the report shall include the name, city, and
state of each person to whom an expenditure or encumbrance was made of at
least twenty-five dollars ($25.00) but no more than one hundred dollars
($100) and the amount, date, and purpose of each such expenditure. For
expenditures of more than one hundred dollars ($100), the report shall
include the name and address of each person to whom an expenditure or en-
cumbrance was made and the amount, date, and purpose of each such expen-
diture. Each expenditure or encumbrance in the amount of twenty-five
dollars ($25.00) or more shall be evidenced by an invoice, receipt, or
canceled check or an accurate copy thereof. Such evidence shall not be
filed with the report but shall be retained by the candidate's treasurer
for a period of one (1) year after the report has been filed. The re-
port may list as a single item the total amount of expenditures and en-
cumbrances of less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) each without show-
ing the exact amount of or requiring evidence of each such expenditure
or encumbrance. Anything of value, other than money, paid for or con-


tributed by any person shall be listed both as an expenditure and as a
contribution.
(2) Regular reports required by this section shall be filed pursuant to
this subsection.
(a) In the year in which the candidate's election is to take place, re-
ports shall be filed on a monthly basis on or before the tenth day of the
month following the month being reported. Additional reports shall be
filed:
(i) Three (3) days before the primary election, covering the pe-
riod from the close of the most recent monthly report through seven
(7) days before the primary election; and
(ii) Three (3) days before the general election, covering the pe-
riod from the close of the most recent monthly report through seven
(7) days before the general election.
(b) In any nonelection year for the candidate, reports shall be filed
on a quarterly basis and shall be due on or before the tenth day of the
month immediately following the close of the quarter, on April 10, July
10, October 10, and January 10.
(3) The political treasurer for a candidate for a judicial office or a
local government office is exempt from filing reports under this chapter un-
less and until such time as the candidate receives contributions or expends
funds in the amount of five hundred dollars ($500) or more. Within seven (7)
calendar days of the five-hundred-dollar ($500) threshold being met, the po-
litical treasurer for the candidate shall file a cumulative report covering
the period from the first contribution or expenditure to the current date and
shall file all subsequent reports on a regular basis according to the provi-
sions of subsection (2) of this section, regardless of amounts received or
expended.
(4) In addition to the reports required pursuant to subsections (2) and
(3) of this section, the political treasurer for a candidate shall report
to the secretary of state any contribution received of one thousand dollars
($1,000) or more within forty-eight (48) hours after the receipt of such con-
tribution. Such a report shall include the name of the candidate, the iden-
tification of the contributor, and the date of receipt and amount of the con-
tribution.
(5) All reports required pursuant to this section shall be filed online
with the secretary of state by no later than midnight on the date the filing
is due.
(6) If no contribution is received or expenditure made by or on behalf
of a candidate during a monthly reporting period, the political treasurer
for the candidate shall file with the secretary of state a report to that ef-
fect by the tenth day of the following month.
(7) Reports required to be filed under the provisions of this section
shall be filed until the account no longer shows any unexpended balance of
contributions or expenditure deficit. Once an account no longer shows a pos-
itive balance or debt, the candidate may notify the secretary of state's of-
fice that the account may be closed. If the account has shown no positive
balance or debt for a period of two (2) years and the candidate has not re-
quested account closure, the secretary of state may administratively close
the candidate's account following thirty (30) days' notice to the candidate.


(8) Candidates for federal office are not required to file contribution
and expenditure reports with the state under this section. A federal can-
didate's authorized committee may make contributions to candidates in Idaho
without filing reports under this subsection if the authorized committee is
in compliance with federal election commission reporting requirements. Any
contributions received pursuant to this section shall be reported using the
official name of the candidate's authorized committee and the identifica-
tion number as registered with the federal election commission.
74-3-206. LIMITATIONS ON CONTRIBUTIONS TO CANDIDATES.
(1)(a) Aggregate contributions by any person to a candidate for the
state legislature, judicial office, or local government office shall be
limited to no more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) for
the primary election and no more than one thousand five hundred dollars
($1,500) for the general election.
(b) Aggregate contributions for a primary election or a general elec-
tion by any person to a candidate for statewide office shall be limited
to no more than six thousand dollars ($6,000) for the primary election
and no more than six thousand dollars ($6,000) for the general election.
For purposes of this subsection, "statewide office" shall mean an of-
fice in state government that appears on the primary or general election
ballot throughout the state.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to
political party committees, including state, county, legislative district,
or regional central committees. Such committees are governed by the provi-
sions of section 74-3-402, Idaho Code.
(3) A candidate may not accept contributions for running in a general
election until the candidate has won his primary election.
(4) Candidates may allocate only those contributions received by the
time the polls close on election day to that election. Contributions re-
ceived after such time must be allocated by the candidate to a future elec-
tion.
(5) For purposes of contribution limits in this section, recall and
special elections shall be treated the same as general elections.
(6) Contributions other than money or its equivalent are deemed to have
a monetary value equivalent to the fair market value of the contribution.
Services or property or rights furnished at less than their fair market value
for the purpose of assisting any candidate or political action committee are
deemed a contribution. A contribution of this kind shall be reported as an
in-kind contribution at its fair market value and counts toward any applica-
ble contribution limit of the contributor. Contributions shall not include
the personal services of volunteers.
(7) For the purposes of contribution limits, the following provisions
apply:
(a) A contribution by a political action committee with funds that have
all been contributed by one (1) person who exercises exclusive control
over the distribution of the funds of the political action committee is
a contribution by the controlling person;
(b) All contributions made by a person or political action committee
whose contribution or expenditure activity is financed, maintained, or


controlled by a trade association, labor union, or collective bargain-
ing organization shall be considered a contribution from such trade as-
sociation, labor union, or collective bargaining organization; and
(c) Two (2) or more entities are treated as a single entity if the enti-
ties:
(i) Share the majority of members on their board of directors;
(ii) Share two (2) or more officers;
(iii) Are owned or controlled by the same majority shareholder or
shareholders or persons;
(iv) Are in a parent-subsidiary relationship; or
(v) Have bylaws so stating.
(8) The contribution limits provided for in this section shall not ap-
ply to a candidate contributing or loaning money to his own campaign account.
(9) A candidate for state legislative office may terminate his campaign
account and transfer the balance of funds to a new campaign account if such
candidate will campaign for a different state legislative office. Any con-
tributions received in the candidate's closed account, combined with any
contributions received in the candidate's new account, shall count against
the contribution limits provided in this section when received from the same
contributor for the same election date.
(10) The provisions of this section are hereby declared to be severable
and if any provision of this section or the application of such provision to
any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason, such declara-
tion shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this section.
74-3-207. CANDIDATE COORDINATION PROHIBITED. (1) A candidate may not
coordinate with another person to benefit from an independent expenditure,
as defined in section 74-3-102, Idaho Code.
(2) If an expenditure is made in coordination with a candidate, it shall
be considered a contribution in-kind to the candidate and shall be reported
by the candidate and be included in the candidate's campaign contribution
limits.
(3) An expenditure by a person that is not made in coordination with a
candidate is not attributed to or reportable by a candidate and must be re-
ported by the person making the independent expenditure pursuant to the pro-
visions of section 74-3-404, Idaho Code.
(4) For the purpose of determining whether an expenditure is made in co-
ordination with a candidate, the term "coordination" means and includes but
is not limited to an expenditure made with the cooperation of, with the prior
consent or knowledge of, in consultation with, at the request or suggestion
of, or using nonpublic information obtained from a candidate or the candi-
date's agent or paid or unpaid staff or volunteer or any person acting as a
conduit for messages to or from the candidate's campaign. Coordination is
presumed if a candidate benefiting from an independent expenditure by a po-
litical action committee is also the treasurer or any other board member of
that political action committee.
74-3-208. RETIRING DEBT. (1) If a candidate has unpaid debt at the end
of the reporting periods specified in section 74-3-205, Idaho Code, then the
candidate may accept additional contributions to retire such unpaid debt,


provided the contributions do not exceed the applicable contribution limits
prescribed in this chapter.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "unpaid debt" means any unpaid
monetary obligation incurred by the candidate as listed on the reports filed
through the postelection report period minus any cash balance reported on
the postelection report. Outstanding loans are considered a type of unpaid
debt.
74-3-209. USE OF CONTRIBUTED AMOUNTS FOR CERTAIN PURPOSES. (1) A con-
tribution accepted by a candidate may be used by the candidate:
(a) For expenditures in connection with the candidate's campaign for
public office;
(b) For ordinary and necessary expenses incurred in connection with du-
ties of the individual as a public officeholder;
(c) For donations to an organization described in 26 U.S.C. 170(c);
(d) For transfers, without limitation, to a national, state, or local
committee of a political party;
(e) For contributions to state and local candidates subject to the pro-
visions of state law; or
(f) For any other lawful purpose unless prohibited by subsection (2) of
this section.
(2) A contribution shall not be converted by any person to personal use.
For the purposes of this subsection, a contribution shall be considered to be
converted to personal use if the contribution is used to fulfill any commit-
ment, obligation, or expense of a person that would exist irrespective of the
candidate's election campaign or individual's duties as a holder of public
office, including:
(a) Mortgage, rent, or utility payments for a candidate's residence;
(b) Clothing, except for items of de minimis value used in a campaign;
(c) A noncampaign- or nonofficeholder-related automobile expense;
(d) A country club membership;
(e) A vacation or other noncampaign-related trip;
(f) A tuition payment;
(g) Admission to a sporting event, concert, theater, or other form of
entertainment not associated with the candidate's campaign;
(h) Dues, fees, and other payments to a health club or recreational fa-
cility, except for fees associated with a campaign fundraising event on
the premises;
(i) Funeral, cremation, or burial expenses, except if the death arises
out of or in the course of campaign activity;
(j) Investment expenses;
(k) Salary payments to a candidate's immediate family member, unless
the family member is providing bona fide services and paid at a fair mar-
ket value; and
(l) Food purchased for daily consumption inside the home or supplies
needed to maintain a household.
74-3-210. USE OF SYNTHETIC MEDIA. (1) This section shall be known and
may be cited as the "Freedom from AI-Rigged (FAIR) Elections Act."
(2) For purposes of this section:


(a) "Information content provider" means any person or entity that is
responsible, in whole or in part, for the creation or development of in-
formation provided through the internet or any other interactive com-
puter service.
(b) "Interactive computer service" means any information service, sys-
tem, or access software provider that provides or enables computer ac-
cess by multiple users to a computer server, including specifically a
service or system that provides access to the internet and such systems
operated or services offered by libraries or educational institutions.
(c) "Synthetic media" means an audio recording or a video recording of
an individual's speech or conduct that has been created through the use
of generative adversarial network techniques or other digital technol-
ogy in a manner to create a realistic but false audio or video that:
(i) Appears to a reasonable individual to be of a real event, ac-
tion, or speech that did not actually occur in reality; and
(ii) Provides a fundamentally different understanding or impres-
sion of the event, action, or speech than a reasonable person would
have from the unaltered, original version of the audio recording
or video recording.
(3) A candidate whose action or speech is deceptively represented
through the use of synthetic media in an electioneering communication, ex-
penditure by a candidate, or independent expenditure may seek injunctive or
other equitable relief prohibiting the publication of such synthetic media.
(4) A candidate whose action or speech is deceptively represented
through the use of synthetic media in an electioneering communication, ex-
penditure by a candidate, or independent expenditure may bring an action for
general damages, special damages, or both against the information content
provider. The court may award a prevailing party reasonable attorney's fees
and costs. The provisions of this subsection do not limit or preclude a
plaintiff from securing or recovering any other available remedy.
(5) It shall be an affirmative defense for any action brought pursuant
to this section that the electioneering communication, expenditure by a
candidate, or independent expenditure containing synthetic media includes
a disclosure stating, "This (video/audio) has been manipulated" in the fol-
lowing manner:
(a) If the media is a video, the text of the disclosure must be promi-
nently displayed and appear in a size easily readable by the average
viewer, and the disclosure must appear for the duration of the video; or
(b) If the media consists of audio only, the disclosure must be read in
a clearly spoken manner and in a pitch that can be easily heard by the
average listener at the beginning of the audio, at the end of the au-
dio, and, if the audio is greater than two (2) minutes in length, in-
terspersed within the audio at intervals of no more than two (2) minutes
each.
(6) In any action commenced pursuant to this section, the plaintiff
bears the burden of establishing the use of synthetic media by clear and
convincing evidence.
(7) Courts are encouraged to determine matters pursuant to this section
expediently.


(8) For an action brought pursuant to this section, the information
content provider of the electioneering communication, expenditure by a
candidate, or independent expenditure may be held liable and not the medium
disseminating the electioneering communication, expenditure by a candi-
date, or independent expenditure except as provided in subsection (9) of
this section.
(9) Except when a licensee, programmer, or operator of a federally li-
censed broadcasting station transmits an electioneering communication, ex-
penditure by a candidate, or independent expenditure that is subject to 47
U.S.C. 315, a medium may be held liable in a cause of action brought pursuant
to this section if:
(a) The medium removes any disclosure described in subsection (5) of
this section from the electioneering communication, expenditure by a
candidate, or independent expenditure it disseminates; or
(b) Subject to affirmative defenses described in this section, the
medium changes the content of an electioneering communication, ex-
penditure by a candidate, or independent expenditure such that it
qualifies as synthetic media.
(10) No provider or user of an interactive computer service shall be
treated as the publisher or speaker of any information provided by another
information content provider. However, an interactive computer service may
be held liable in accordance with subsection (9) of this section.
SECTION 4. That Chapter 3, Title 74, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW PART, to be known and desig-
nated as Part 3, Chapter 3, Title 74, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
PART 3
POLITICAL ACTION COMMITTEES
74-3-301. POLITICAL ACTION COMMITTEE -- ORGANIZATION.
(1)(a) An individual, corporation, association, firm, partnership,
committee, political party, club, or other organization or group of
persons is a political action committee required to report under this
chapter if it:
(i) Is specifically designated to support or oppose any candidate
or measure; or
(ii) Receives contributions and makes expenditures in an amount
exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) in any calendar year for
the purpose of supporting or opposing one (1) or more candidates or
measures.
(b) A county, legislative district, or regional committee of a recog-
nized political party shall not be required to report under this chapter
as a political action committee unless it has expenditures exceeding
five thousand dollars ($5,000) in a calendar year. Political party com-
mittees are subject to the requirements for political action committees
set forth in this part except as otherwise provided in section 74-3-402,
Idaho Code.
(2) Each political action committee shall appoint a political trea-
surer. No contribution shall be received and no expenditure may be made by


or on behalf of a political action committee until a political treasurer has
been appointed pursuant to the provisions of section 74-3-302, Idaho Code.
(3) Each political action committee shall establish a campaign finance
account with the secretary of state no later than ten (10) days after be-
coming a political action committee required to report pursuant to the pro-
visions of subsection (1) of this section. The political action committee
shall certify:
(a) The name and address of the committee; and
(b) The name and address of the political treasurer of the committee.
(4) Any change in organization information previously submitted to the
secretary of state shall be reported no later than ten (10) days after the
date of the change.
74-3-302. POLITICAL ACTION COMMITTEE -- APPOINTMENT OF POLITICAL
TREASURER. (1) Each political action committee shall appoint a political
treasurer who is a registered elector of this state.
(2) An individual may be appointed and serve as political treasurer for
more than one (1) political action committee and candidate.
(3) A political action committee may remove its political treasurer.
In the case of the death, resignation, or removal of its political treasurer
before all obligations of a political treasurer under this chapter have been
met, the political action committee shall appoint a successor political
treasurer and certify the name and address of the successor to the secretary
of state.
74-3-303. DUTIES OF POLITICAL TREASURER FOR POLITICAL ACTION COMMIT-
TEE. (1) The political treasurer shall serve as the official point of contact
for the secretary of state for the political action committee.
(2) The political treasurer for each political action committee shall
maintain at least one (1) checking account with a financial institution. All
moneys received by the political action committee shall be deposited in such
account. The political treasurer shall keep detailed accounts of all con-
tributions received and all expenditures made by or on behalf of the politi-
cal action committee. The political treasurer shall keep the accounts cur-
rent within seven (7) days after the date of receiving a contribution or mak-
ing an expenditure. The political action committee's funds shall be segre-
gated from and may not be commingled with any other account.
(3) The political treasurer shall be responsible for making and fil-
ing all reports that are required of a political action committee under this
chapter. Accounts kept by the political treasurer for a political action
committee are subject to inspection by the office of the secretary of state
in the case of an investigation pursuant to section 74-3-501 or 74-3-502,
Idaho Code.
(4) Accounts kept by a political treasurer shall be preserved by him for
at least one (1) year after the date of the election to which the accounts re-
fer or at least one (1) year after the date the last report is filed under sec-
tion 74-3-306, Idaho Code, whichever is later.
74-3-304. CONTRIBUTIONS OBTAINED BY A POLITICAL ACTION COMMITTEE. (1)
A political action committee may solicit or obtain contributions from indi-


viduals as provided in chapter 26, title 44, Idaho Code, or as provided in
section 44-2004, Idaho Code.
(2)(a) Any person who contributes to a political action committee shall
accompany the contribution with a report of his full name and complete
address.
(b) If a political treasurer is offered or receives contributions of
more than one hundred dollars ($100) in the aggregate from the same per-
son during a calendar year, and there is no report of the full name and
complete address of the person making the contribution, the contribu-
tion shall be returned to the contributor if his identity can be ascer-
tained. If the contributor's identity cannot be ascertained, the con-
tribution shall be transmitted immediately by the political treasurer
to the secretary of state, who shall transmit it to the state controller
for deposit in the general fund.
(3) Contributions shall not be obtained for a political action commit-
tee by use of coercion or physical force, by making a contribution a condi-
tion of employment or membership, or by using or threatening to use job dis-
crimination or financial reprisals. A violation of the provisions of this
section shall be punishable as provided in part 5 of this chapter.
74-3-305. USE OF CONTRIBUTED AMOUNTS FOR CERTAIN PURPOSES. (1) A con-
tribution accepted by a political action committee may be used:
(a) For expenditures in connection with the political action commit-
tee's purpose of campaigning for the election or defeat of a candidate
or measure;
(b) For the ordinary and necessary expenses of a political action com-
mittee;
(c) For donations to an organization described in 26 U.S.C. 170(c);
(d) For transfers, without limitation, to a national, state, or local
committee of a political party;
(e) For contributions to state and local candidates subject to the pro-
visions of state law; or
(f) For any other lawful purpose unless prohibited by subsection (2) of
this section.
(2) A contribution shall not be converted by any person for personal
use. For the purposes of this subsection, a contribution shall be considered
to be converted to personal use if the contribution is used to fulfill any
commitment, obligation, or expense of a person that would exist irrespective
of the political action committee's campaign activities.
74-3-306. REPORTS OF CONTRIBUTIONS TO AND EXPENDITURES BY POLITICAL
ACTION COMMITTEES. (1) The political treasurer for each political action
committee shall file with the secretary of state a report each month of all
contributions received and all expenditures and encumbrances made by or on
behalf of the political action committee during the preceding month by no
later than the tenth day of the following month. The report shall itemize
each contribution received and each expenditure or encumbrance made during
the monthly reporting period and shall include the following:
(a) Under contributions, the report shall include a list of all the con-
tributions received, including any funds or property of the political


action committee used to cover expenditures. The report shall list the
full name and complete address of each person who contributed an aggre-
gate amount of more than one hundred dollars ($100) and the amount con-
tributed by that person. The report may list as a single item the total
amount of contributions of one hundred dollars ($100) or less; and
(b) Under expenditures, the report shall include the name, city, and
state of each person to whom an expenditure or encumbrance was made of at
least twenty-five dollars ($25.00) but no more than one hundred dollars
($100) and the amount, date, and purpose of each such expenditure. For
expenditures of more than one hundred dollars ($100), the report shall
include the name and address of each person to whom an expenditure or en-
cumbrance was made and the amount, date, and purpose of each such expen-
diture. All expenditures or encumbrances in the amount of twenty-five
dollars ($25.00) or more shall be evidenced by an invoice, receipt, or
canceled check or an accurate copy thereof. Such evidence shall not be
filed with the report but shall be retained by the political treasurer
for a period of one (1) year after the report has been filed. The re-
port may list as a single item the total amount of expenditures and en-
cumbrances of less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) each without show-
ing the exact amount of or requiring evidence of each such expenditure
or encumbrance. Anything of value, other than money, paid for or con-
tributed by any person shall be listed both as an expenditure and as a
contribution.
(2) In any year in which an election is held for a candidate that a po-
litical action committee supports or opposes by making expenditures or re-
ceiving contributions related to such candidate's election, the political
treasurer for such political action committee shall file additional reports
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section as follows:
(a) Three (3) days before the primary election, covering the period
from the close of the most recent monthly report through seven (7) days
before the primary election; and
(b) Three (3) days before the general election, covering the period
from the close of the most recent monthly report through seven (7) days
before the general election.
(3) In addition to any other reports required under this section, the
political treasurer for each political action committee shall report to the
secretary of state any contribution of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more
within forty-eight (48) hours after the receipt of such contribution. Such
a report shall include the name of the political action committee, the iden-
tification of the contributor, and the date of receipt and amount of the con-
tribution. The report shall be in addition to the reporting of these contri-
butions in the regular monthly reports.
(4) All reports required pursuant to this section shall be filed online
with the secretary of state by no later than midnight on the date the filing
is due.
(5) If no contribution is received or expenditure made by or on behalf
of a political action committee during a monthly reporting period, the po-
litical treasurer for the political action committee shall file with the
secretary of state a report to that effect by the tenth day of the following
month.


(6) Reports required to be filed under the provisions of this section
shall be filed until the account no longer shows any unexpended balance of
contributions or expenditure deficit. Once an account no longer shows a pos-
itive balance or debt, the political treasurer may notify the secretary of
state's office that the account may be closed. If the account has shown no
positive balance or debt for a period of two (2) years and the political trea-
surer has not requested account closure, the secretary of state may admin-
istratively close the political action committee's account following thirty
(30) days' notice to the political action committee.
(7) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, a political
action committee that is registered with the federal election commission
must file reports in accordance with the provisions of this section if the
political action committee:
(a) Makes contributions to Idaho candidates;
(b) Makes an electioneering communication in Idaho; or
(c) Makes an independent expenditure in Idaho.
(8) A federal candidate's leadership political action committee may
make contributions and expenditures in Idaho without filing reports under
this section if the leadership political action committee is in compli-
ance with federal election commission reporting requirements and follows
applicable laws. The recipient of any contributions made pursuant to this
subsection shall be reported using the official name of the candidate's
leadership political action committee and the identification number as reg-
istered with the federal election commission.
74-3-307. POLITICAL ACTION COMMITTEE COORDINATION. (1) A political
action committee may not coordinate with a candidate to benefit that candi-
date with an independent expenditure, as defined in section 74-3-102, Idaho
Code.
(2) If an expenditure is made in coordination with a candidate, it shall
be considered a contribution in-kind to the candidate and shall be reported
by the candidate and be included in the candidate's campaign contribution
limits.
(3) For the purpose of determining whether an expenditure is made in co-
ordination with a candidate, the term "coordination" means and includes but
is not limited to an expenditure made with the cooperation of, with the prior
consent or knowledge of, in consultation with, at the request or suggestion
of, or by using nonpublic information obtained from a candidate or the can-
didate's agent or paid or unpaid staff or volunteer or any person acting as
a conduit for messages to or from the candidate's campaign. Coordination
shall be presumed if the political action committee's expenditure or inde-
pendent expenditure benefits a candidate who is also the political action
committee's treasurer or other board member.
74-3-308. ELECTIONEERING COMMUNICATIONS. (1) In addition to any other
reports required under this chapter, the political treasurer for each po-
litical action committee shall report to the secretary of state any expendi-
ture for an electioneering communication of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or
more.


(a) For electioneering communications made on or before the sixteenth
day before any primary or general election, the report shall be filed
within forty-eight (48) hours after the expenditure.
(b) For electioneering communications made after the sixteenth day be-
fore an election, but more than twenty-four (24) hours before any pri-
mary or general election, the report shall be filed within twenty-four
(24) hours after the expenditure.
(2) The report shall be in addition to the reporting of these expendi-
tures in the regular monthly reports. The report shall contain:
(a) The name and address of any third party to whom an expenditure has
been made by the reporting political action committee in reference to
any candidate or measure, together with the amount, date, and purpose of
each such expenditure, including the identity of the referenced candi-
date or measure; and
(b) The total sum of all electioneering communications made by the po-
litical action committee filing the report since the first day of the
preceding calendar year.
(3) For the purpose of determining when a report should be filed under
this section, an electioneering communication is made on the day that the
electioneering communication is publicly distributed or otherwise viewed by
the public or on the date payment is made, whichever is earlier.
74-3-309. INDEPENDENT EXPENDITURES. (1) In addition to any other re-
ports required under this chapter, the political treasurer for each politi-
cal action committee shall report to the secretary of state any independent
expenditure in an aggregate amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more
as provided in this section.
(a) In the case of an independent expenditure totaling one thousand
dollars ($1,000) or more made on or before the sixteenth day be-
fore a primary or general election, the report shall be filed within
forty-eight (48) hours of making the expenditure.
(b) In the case of an independent expenditure totaling one thousand
dollars ($1,000) or more made after the sixteenth day before an election
but more than twenty-four (24) hours before a primary or general elec-
tion, the report shall be filed within twenty-four (24) hours of making
the expenditure.
(c) In the case of an independent expenditure totaling less than one
thousand dollars ($1,000), the report shall be filed by the tenth day of
the month following the month in which the independent expenditure was
made.
(2) The report shall be in addition to the reporting of these expendi-
tures in the regular monthly reports. The report shall contain:
(a) The name and address of any third party to whom an independent
expenditure totaling one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more has been
made by the reporting political action committee for an independent
expenditure in support of or in opposition to any candidate or measure,
together with the amount, date, and purpose of each such expenditure,
including the identity of the referenced candidate or measure, and
whether the expenditure was made either in support of or in opposition
to such candidate or measure; and


(b) The total sum of all independent expenditures made by the reporting
political action committee since the first day of the preceding calen-
dar year in support of or in opposition to any such candidate or measure.
74-3-310. MEASURE EXPENDITURES. (1) In addition to any other reports
required under this chapter, the political treasurer for each political ac-
tion committee shall report to the secretary of state any measure expendi-
ture in an aggregate amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more as pro-
vided in this section.
(a) In the case of a measure expenditure totaling one thousand dollars
($1,000) or more made on or before the sixteenth day before a primary
or general election, the report shall be filed within forty-eight (48)
hours of making the expenditure.
(b) In the case of a measure expenditure totaling one thousand dollars
($1,000) or more made after the sixteenth day before an election but
more than twenty-four (24) hours before a primary or general election,
the report shall be filed within twenty-four (24) hours of making the
expenditure.
(c) In the case of a measure expenditure totaling less than one thousand
dollars ($1,000), the report shall be filed by the tenth day of the month
following the month in which the measure expenditure was made.
(2) The report shall be in addition to the reporting of these expendi-
tures in the regular monthly reports. The report shall contain:
(a) The name and address of any third party to whom a measure expendi-
ture totaling one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more has been made by the
reporting political action committee for a measure expenditure in sup-
port of or in opposition to any measure, together with the amount, date,
and purpose of each such expenditure, including the identity of the ref-
erenced measure, and whether the expenditure was made either in support
of or in opposition to such measure; and
(b) The total sum of all measure expenditures made by the reporting po-
litical action committee since the first day of the preceding calendar
year in support of or in opposition to any such measure.
SECTION 5. That Chapter 3, Title 74, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW PART, to be known and desig-
nated as Part 4, Chapter 3, Title 74, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
PART 4
OTHER PERSONS REQUIRED TO REPORT
74-3-401. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. In order to promote transparency re-
garding the impact of all election-related financial contributions or
expenditures, it is the intent of the legislature that all persons, not just
those who are required to register as a candidate or a political action com-
mittee, shall be required to publicly report financial contributions made or
expenditures paid. All such persons making electioneering communications
or independent expenditures in Idaho shall file reports with the secretary
of state according to the provisions of this part.


74-3-402. POLITICAL PARTY COMMITTEES AND CAUCUSES -- CONTRIBUTIONS --
REPORTS -- LIMITS. (1) Contributions by political party central committees,
including state, county, and legislative district, and legislative caucuses
of a recognized political party qualified under section 34-501, Idaho Code,
are governed by the provisions of this section.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (6) of this section, po-
litical party committees and caucuses governed by this section shall file
reports of their expenditures and contributions at the same time and in the
same manner as political action committees pursuant to part 3 of this chap-
ter.
(3) For state legislative races, a committee governed by this section
shall not contribute to any single candidate more than three thousand dol-
lars ($3,000) in the aggregate for a primary election and three thousand dol-
lars ($3,000) in the aggregate for a general election.
(4) For statewide office races, a committee governed by this section
shall not contribute to any single candidate more than twelve thousand dol-
lars ($12,000) in the aggregate for the primary election and twelve thousand
dollars ($12,000) in the aggregate for the general election.
(5) No contribution may be made for a general election to a candidate
who has not won his primary election, if any.
(6) A county or legislative district central committee of a recognized
political party shall not be considered a political action committee for the
purposes of filing reports under this chapter unless such political party
committee has expenditures exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000) in a
calendar year.
74-3-403. ELECTIONEERING COMMUNICATIONS. (1) Any person other than a
political action committee who makes an electioneering communication, as
defined in section 74-3-102, Idaho Code, in an aggregate amount of one hun-
dred dollars ($100) or more must file a report with the secretary of state.
The report shall contain the following information:
(a) The name and address of any third party to whom an expenditure in
excess of fifty dollars ($50.00) has been made by the reporting person
in reference to any candidate, political action committee, or measure,
together with the amount, date, and purpose of each such expenditure,
including the identity of the referenced candidate or measure;
(b) The total sum of all electioneering communications made by the
person filing the report since the first day of the preceding calendar
year; and
(c) The name and address of any donor who made aggregate contributions
of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more to the person filing the report
since the first day of the preceding calendar year to the date of the re-
port earmarked for the reported electioneering communication. The re-
port may list as a single item the total amount of contributions made by
donors who gave less than one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(2) The report shall be filed with the secretary of state pursuant to
this subsection.
(a) In the case of an electioneering communication totaling one thou-
sand dollars ($1,000) or more made on or before the sixteenth day before
a primary or general election at which the referenced candidate will ap-


pear on the ballot, the report shall be filed within forty-eight (48)
hours of making the expenditure.
(b) In the case of an electioneering communication totaling one thou-
sand dollars ($1,000) or more made after the sixteenth day before an
election but more than twenty-four (24) hours before a primary or gen-
eral election at which the referenced candidate will appear on the
ballot, the report shall be filed within twenty-four (24) hours of mak-
ing the expenditure.
(c) In the case of electioneering communications totaling less than one
thousand dollars ($1,000), the report shall be filed by the tenth day
of the month following the month in which the electioneering communica-
tions were made.
(3) For the purpose of determining when a report should be filed under
this section, an electioneering communication is made on the day that the
electioneering communication is publicly distributed or otherwise viewed by
the public or on the date payment is made, whichever is earlier.
74-3-404. INDEPENDENT EXPENDITURES. (1) An independent expenditure,
as defined in section 74-3-102, Idaho Code, is an expenditure by any person
for a communication expressly advocating the election, passage, or defeat of
a clearly identified candidate or measure if the expenditure is not coordi-
nated with the candidate. An expenditure that is independent of a candidate
is not attributed to or reportable by a candidate and must be reported by the
person making the independent expenditure pursuant to the provisions of this
section.
(2) If an expenditure is made in coordination with the candidate, it
shall be considered a contribution in-kind to the candidate, reported by the
candidate, and included in the candidate's campaign contribution limits.
(3) For the purpose of determining whether an expenditure is made in co-
ordination with a candidate, the term "coordination" means and includes but
is not limited to an expenditure made with the cooperation of, with the prior
consent or knowledge of, in consultation with, at the request or suggestion
of, or using nonpublic information obtained from a candidate or the candi-
date's agent or paid or unpaid staff or volunteer or by a person acting as a
conduit for messages to or from a candidate's campaign.
(4) Each person who makes an independent expenditure in an aggregate
amount of one hundred dollars ($100) or more shall file a report of the expen-
diture with the secretary of state. The report shall contain:
(a) The name and address of any third party to whom an expenditure in ex-
cess of fifty dollars ($50.00) has been made by the reporting person for
an independent expenditure in support of or in opposition to any can-
didate or measure, together with the amount, date, and purpose of each
such expenditure, including the identity of the referenced candidate or
measure, and whether the expenditure was made either in support of or in
opposition to such candidate or measure;
(b) The total sum of all independent expenditures made by the reporting
person since the first day of the preceding calendar year in support of
or in opposition to any such candidate or measure; and
(c) The name and address of any donor who made aggregate contributions
of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more to the person making the report


since the first day of the preceding calendar year earmarked for the re-
ported independent expenditure. The report may list as a single item
the total amount of contributions made by donors who gave less than one
thousand dollars ($1,000).
(5) The report shall be filed with the secretary of state pursuant to
this subsection.
(a) In the case of an independent expenditure totaling one thousand
dollars ($1,000) or more made on or before the sixteenth day before a
primary or general election at which the referenced candidate will ap-
pear on the ballot, the report shall be filed within forty-eight (48)
hours of making the expenditure.
(b) In the case of an independent expenditure totaling one thousand
dollars ($1,000) or more made after the sixteenth day before an elec-
tion but more than twenty-four (24) hours before a primary or general
election at which the referenced candidate will appear on the ballot,
the report shall be filed within twenty-four (24) hours of making the
expenditure.
(c) In the case of independent expenditures totaling less than one
thousand dollars ($1,000), the report shall be filed by the tenth day
of the month following the month in which the independent expenditures
were made.
74-3-405. MEASURE EXPENDITURES. (1) A measure expenditure, as defined
in section 74-3-102, Idaho Code, is an expenditure by any person for a commu-
nication expressly advocating the passage or defeat of a clearly identified
measure. An expenditure that is independent of a political action committee
sponsoring a measure is not attributed to or reportable by such political ac-
tion committee and must be reported by the person making the measure expendi-
ture pursuant to the provisions of this section.
(2) Each person who makes a measure expenditure in an aggregate amount
of one hundred dollars ($100) or more shall file a report of the expenditure
with the secretary of state. The report shall contain:
(a) The name and address of any third party to whom an expenditure in ex-
cess of fifty dollars ($50.00) has been made by the reporting person for
a measure expenditure in support of or in opposition to any measure, to-
gether with the amount, date, and purpose of each such expenditure, in-
cluding the identity of the referenced measure, and whether the expen-
diture was made either in support of or in opposition to such measure;
(b) The total sum of all measure expenditures made by the reporting per-
son since the first day of the preceding calendar year in support of or
in opposition to any such measure; and
(c) The name and address of any donor who made aggregate contributions
of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more to the person making the report
since the first day of the preceding calendar year earmarked for the re-
ported measure expenditure. The report may list as a single item the to-
tal amount of contributions made by donors who gave less than one thou-
sand dollars ($1,000).
(3) The report shall be filed with the secretary of state pursuant to
this subsection.


(a) In the case of a measure expenditure totaling one thousand dollars
($1,000) or more made on or before the sixteenth day before the election
at which the referenced measure will appear on the ballot, the report
shall be filed within forty-eight (48) hours of making the expenditure.
(b) In the case of a measure expenditure totaling one thousand dollars
($1,000) or more made after the sixteenth day before an election but
more than twenty-four (24) hours before the election at which the ref-
erenced measure will appear on the ballot, the report shall be filed
within twenty-four (24) hours of making the expenditure.
(c) In the case of measure expenditures totaling less than one thousand
dollars ($1,000), the report shall be filed by the tenth day of the month
following the month in which the measure expenditures were made.
SECTION 6. That Chapter 3, Title 74, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW PART, to be known and desig-
nated as Part 5, Chapter 3, Title 74, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
PART 5
ADMINISTRATION OF CHAPTER -- DUTIES -- ENFORCEMENT -- VIOLATIONS --
PENALTIES
74-3-501. DUTIES OF SECRETARY OF STATE. (1) The secretary of state is
charged with the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter.
(2) The secretary of state shall maintain an online filing system for
the filing and publication of all reports required pursuant to this chapter.
The online filing system shall accommodate the filings of all candidates,
political action committees, and others who are required to report pursuant
to this chapter. The online filing system shall be designed to aid and en-
sure compliance with the reporting requirements of this chapter. The online
filing system shall be accessible on the secretary of state's website and be
searchable by the public by candidate, committee, contribution, contribu-
tor, date, expense, office, party, purpose, and any other content deemed ap-
propriate by the secretary of state.
(3) The secretary of state shall confirm the filing of each report filed
pursuant to this chapter for statewide, legislative, and judicial district
offices or measures within two (2) days after the due date of the report or
after the date it is filed, whichever is later. The secretary of state shall
notify a person required to file a report under this chapter immediately if:
(a) It appears that the person has failed to file a report as required by
law or that a report filed by the person does not conform to law; or
(b) A written complaint is filed with the secretary of state by any reg-
istered voter alleging that a person has failed to file a report as re-
quired by law or that a report filed with the secretary of state does not
conform to law or to the truth.
(4) The secretary of state may require any person to answer in writing
and under oath or affirmation any question within the knowledge of that per-
son concerning the source of any contribution or expenditure.
(5) The secretary of state may make administrative adjustments to cam-
paign finance accounts in coordination with the political treasurer of the
account to correct any imbalances identified. If the imbalance was accrued
willfully and knowingly, the secretary of state may assess a fine not to ex-


ceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount identified to be out of balance
and deposit the amount assessed into the general fund.
(6) In addition to duties otherwise prescribed in this section, it
shall be the duty of the secretary of state:
(a) To make investigations of reports filed under the provisions of
this chapter with respect to statewide, legislative, and judicial of-
fices and measures and alleged failures to file any report required
under the provisions of this chapter and upon complaint by any person
with respect to alleged violations of any part of this chapter;
(b) To report suspected criminal violations of law to the attorney gen-
eral for referral to the appropriate law enforcement authorities;
(c) To prescribe and publish rules, subject to legislative approval, in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, and
to take such other actions as may be appropriate to carry out the provi-
sions of this chapter; and
(d) To assess fees and fines authorized by the provisions of this chap-
ter.
74-3-502. DUTIES OF COUNTY CLERKS AND PROSECUTORS. (1) For all report-
ing requirements prescribed by this chapter for all local government offices
or measures for which the county is the home county, as defined in section
34-1401, Idaho Code, the county clerk shall serve in the place of the secre-
tary of state and the county prosecutor in the place of the attorney general.
(2) In the event of a potential conflict of interest by a county clerk, a
county clerk may enter into an agreement with the clerk of a different county
to investigate any complaints or potential violations of the provisions of
this chapter.
(3) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any fines
collected by a county clerk pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in
the county general fund of such county.
74-3-503. FAILURE TO REPORT -- VIOLATIONS -- CIVIL FINES -- MISDE-
MEANOR. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, any person who
fails to file a report of contributions, expenditures, independent expen-
ditures, or any other report required by this chapter shall be liable to the
secretary of state for a civil fine in the amount of fifty dollars ($50.00)
plus five percent (5%) of the monetary value of the amount not reported,
rounded up to the nearest whole number. The secretary of state shall deposit
any civil fines collected pursuant to this section in the general fund. The
burden of proof for such civil liability shall be met by showing a preponder-
ance of the evidence.
(2) In addition to the fines set forth in subsection (1) of this sec-
tion, any person who knowingly and willfully fails to file a report required
by this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, may be im-
prisoned for up to six (6) months.
74-3-504. LATE FILING OF REPORT -- FEES. (1) If any person registered
with the secretary of state fails to file a report required by this chap-
ter on or before the prescribed deadline, such person shall be liable to the
secretary of state for a late fee in the amount of fifty dollars ($50.00)


plus ten dollars ($10.00) for each day until the report is filed, which fee
shall be deposited in the general fund. The late fee shall not exceed a to-
tal of one thousand dollars ($1,000). Such fees shall be assessed begin-
ning forty-eight (48) hours after the deadline and extend until the report
is filed. The secretary of state shall notify the person and the political
treasurer, if any, that a late fee has been assessed and will continue to ac-
crue until the report has been filed. The notification shall be made by tele-
phone or electronic means within twenty-four (24) hours of the missed filing
deadline.
(2) The remedy provided in this section is cumulative and does not ex-
clude any other remedy or penalty prescribed in this chapter.
74-3-505. OTHER VIOLATIONS -- CIVIL FINES -- MISDEMEANOR. (1) Except
as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person who vi-
olates a provision of this chapter that does not pertain to the failure to
file a report or the late filing of a report shall be liable to the secretary
of state for a civil fine in the amount of two thousand five hundred dollars
($2,500), plus five percent (5%) of the monetary value of the amount of the
expenditure related to the violation, if applicable, rounded up to the near-
est whole number. The secretary of state shall deposit any civil fines col-
lected pursuant to this section in the general fund. The burden of proof for
such civil liability shall be met by showing a preponderance of the evidence.
(2) Any person who knowingly and willfully commits a violation of a pro-
vision of this chapter that does not pertain to the failure to file a report
or the late filing of a report is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon convic-
tion, may be imprisoned for up to six (6) months.
74-3-506. ENFORCEMENT OF CIVIL FINES AND LATE FEES. If any civil fine
or late fee prescribed under this part is not paid within sixty (60) days fol-
lowing notice from the secretary of state's office, the secretary of state
may publish the delinquent accounts on the public campaign finance website.
Any civil fine or late fee remaining unpaid after sixty (60) days following
notice from the secretary of state's office may be referred to the office of
the attorney general or to the appropriate prosecuting attorney for collec-
tion.
74-3-507. PROSECUTION -- LIMITATION -- VENUE. (1) The attorney gen-
eral may prosecute any violations of this chapter.
(2) Prosecution for a civil or misdemeanor violation of this chapter
must be commenced within two (2) years after the date on which the violation
occurred. Prosecution for a felony violation of this chapter must be com-
menced pursuant to the provisions of section 19-402, Idaho Code.
(3) Venue for prosecution under the provisions of this chapter shall be
in the county of residence of the defendant if the defendant is a resident of
the state of Idaho, otherwise venue shall be in Ada county.
74-3-508. INJUNCTIONS. The district courts of this state shall have
original jurisdiction to issue injunctions to enforce the provisions of this
chapter upon application by any citizen of this state, by the secretary of
state, or by a county clerk. The court may in its discretion require the


citizen plaintiff to file a written complaint with the secretary of state
or county clerk prior to seeking injunctive relief. A successful plaintiff
is entitled to be reimbursed for reasonable costs of litigation, including
reasonable attorney's fees, by the person or persons named defendant in such
injunctive action. A successful defendant is entitled to be reimbursed for
reasonable costs of litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees, if
the court determines that the plaintiff's action was without substantial
merit.
74-3-509. SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this chapter or its ap-
plication to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of
the chapter or the application of the provision to other persons or circum-
stances is not affected.
74-3-510. CONSTRUCTION. The provisions of this chapter are to be lib-
erally construed to effectuate the policies and purposes of this chapter. In
the event of conflict between the provisions of this chapter and any other
chapter, the provisions of this chapter shall govern.
SECTION 7. That Chapter 18, Title 34, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 34-1807A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
34-1807A. DISCLOSURE OF PAYMENTS MADE TO SIGNATURE GATHERERS. (1) Any
person who pays or provides other valuable consideration in an aggregate
amount of one hundred dollars ($100) or more to another person or persons in
exchange for their actions or intended actions of gathering signatures on a
ballot initiative petition or referendum shall file a report of the expendi-
ture with the secretary of state.
(2) The provisions of this section shall apply beginning on the date
that the ballot initiative or referendum petitioners receive from the secre-
tary of state the official ballot title for which the person is paying to have
signatures gathered and shall continue for as long as the filer makes pay-
ments to a signature gatherer or gatherers.
(3) Reports shall be filed on or before the twentieth day of the month
following the month during which the payments to the signature gatherers
were made.
(4) The report shall contain the following information:
(a) The name and address of any signature gatherer to whom a payment
in excess of fifty dollars ($50.00) has been made during the reported
month; and
(b) The total sum of all payments made to signature gatherers in the ag-
gregate during the reported month.
(5) In addition to the reports filed under subsection (3) of this sec-
tion, any person who pays a signature gatherer or gatherers an aggregate
amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more shall file a notice of the
expenditures with the secretary of state within forty-eight (48) hours of
making the expenditure. The notice shall include the information required
under subsection (4) of this section.
(6) The secretary of state shall prescribe the form of the report re-
quired under this section. The powers and duties of the secretary of state


set forth in part 5, chapter 3, title 74, Idaho Code, shall apply and be
available to the secretary of state for enforcement of the provisions of this
section.
SECTION 8. That Section 19-5904, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
19-5904. STATE APPELLATE PUBLIC DEFENDER -- APPOINTMENT -- TERM --
QUALIFICATIONS -- PROHIBITED CONDUCT -- REMOVAL -- VACANCIES -- COMPEN-
SATION. (1) The state appellate public defender shall be appointed by the
governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, to serve a four (4) year
term and may be reappointed to subsequent terms in the same manner.
(2) The state appellate public defender must meet the following quali-
fications on the effective date of his appointment:
(a) Be at least thirty (30) years of age;
(b) Be a citizen of the United States;
(c) Have held a license to practice law or a judicial office in one (1)
or more jurisdictions of the United States for at least five (5) contin-
uous years immediately preceding such appointment;
(d) Be or become an active member of the Idaho state bar within one (1)
year of appointment and remain an active member in good standing there-
after; and
(e) Have at least five (5) years of criminal defense or appellate expe-
rience, or a combination thereof.
(3) The state appellate public defender shall not:
(a) Engage in the practice of law outside his role in the office of the
state appellate public defender, except for the practice of law that is
permitted for a judge by the Idaho code of judicial conduct;
(b) Hold or be a candidate for any federal, state, county, municipal,
judicial, district, or other elective office; provided, however, this
section shall not be interpreted to prohibit the state appellate public
defender from seeking appointment to another office, including state or
federal judicial office;
(c) Serve as the agent, representative, officer, political treasurer,
or employee, for profit or otherwise, of any political party, political
committee, or candidate, as such terms are defined in chapter 66, title
67 chapter 3, title 74, Idaho Code; or
(d) Hold any other public or private sector position, for profit or oth-
erwise, except for volunteer positions that are not inconsistent with
the duties of the state appellate public defender.
(4) The state appellate public defender may be removed from office by
the governor for failing to retain the qualifications of his office estab-
lished in subsection (2) of this section, for engaging in prohibited conduct
set forth in subsection (3) of this section, or for good cause shown. If the
state appellate public defender is removed from office, the governor shall
provide the house of representatives and the senate written notice of the re-
moval, the effective date of removal, and the reason or reasons therefor.
(5) If the state appellate public defender resigns, dies, or is removed
from office as provided by law, the governor shall appoint a person who meets
the qualifications established in this section, subject to the advice and
consent of the senate, to fill the remainder of the unexpired term.


(6) The state appellate public defender shall be compensated in an
amount determined by the governor.
SECTION 9. That Section 19-6004, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
19-6004. STATE PUBLIC DEFENDER -- APPOINTMENT -- TERM -- PROHIBITED
CONDUCT -- REMOVAL -- VACANCIES -- REAPPOINTMENT -- COMPENSATION. (1) The
state public defender shall reside in the office of the state public defender
and shall be appointed by the governor, in a manner consistent with subsec-
tion (6) of this section, to serve a four (4) year term.
(2) The state public defender must meet the following qualifications on
the effective date of appointment:
(a) Be at least thirty (30) years of age;
(b) Be a citizen of the United States;
(c) Have held a license to practice law or a judicial office in one (1)
or more jurisdictions of the United States for at least five (5) contin-
uous years immediately preceding the appointment;
(d) Be or become an active member of the Idaho state bar within one (1)
year of appointment and remain an active member in good standing there-
after; and
(e) Have at least five (5) years of criminal defense experience.
(3) The state public defender shall not:
(a) Engage in the practice of law outside his role in the office of the
state public defender, except for the practice of law that is permitted
for a judge by the Idaho code of judicial conduct;
(b) Hold or be a candidate for any federal, state, county, municipal,
judicial, district, or other elective office; provided, however, this
paragraph does not prohibit the state public defender from seeking ap-
pointment to another office, including state or federal judicial of-
fice;
(c) Serve as the agent, representative, officer, political treasurer,
or employee, whether for profit or otherwise, of any political party,
political committee, or candidate, as such terms are defined in chapter
1, title 34, Idaho Code, and chapter 66, title 67 chapter 3, title 74,
Idaho Code; or
(d) Hold any other public or private sector position, for profit or oth-
erwise, except for volunteer positions that are not inconsistent with
the duties of the state public defender.
(4) The state public defender may be removed from office by the gover-
nor for failing to retain the qualifications of his office provided in sub-
section (2) of this section, for engaging in prohibited conduct set forth in
subsection (3) of this section, or for good cause shown. If the state pub-
lic defender is removed from office, the governor shall provide the house of
representatives and the senate written notice of the removal, the effective
date of removal, and the reason or reasons therefor.
(5) If the state public defender resigns, dies, or is removed from of-
fice as provided by law, the governor shall appoint a person who meets the
qualifications established in this section, in a manner consistent with sub-
section (6) of this section, to fill the unexpired term.


(6) The governor shall appoint a state public defender in the following
manner:
(a) Whenever a vacancy arises in the position of state public defender,
the governor shall appoint a panel with seven (7) members, with one
(1) panel member appointed from the membership of each of the seven (7)
district magistrates commissions. Not less than two (2) but not more
than (3) panel members shall be attorneys, not more than two (2) but not
less than one (1) panel member shall be a county commissioner, and one
(1) member shall be a mayor. The governor shall not appoint to the panel
any member of a district magistrates commission who is a judge, who is
employed as a criminal prosecutor, or who otherwise prosecutes or aids
in the prosecution of criminal cases, or any person employed in a law
enforcement agency. The governor shall select a member of the panel to
serve as chairman. The provisions of section 1-2203B(4), Idaho Code,
regarding current or former law partners shall apply to any attorney
serving on the panel. Members of the panel shall be compensated by the
office of the state public defender as provided in section 59-509(b),
Idaho Code.
(b) It shall be the duty of the panel to recruit applicants, review can-
didates, and submit to the governor a list of not less than three (3),
but not more than five (5), attorneys who meet the qualifications es-
tablished in this chapter, and the governor shall appoint the state pub-
lic defender from the list, with the advice and consent of the senate.
If three (3) qualified candidates or fewer apply, the panel shall sub-
mit all applicants to the governor and may communicate to the governor
or the governor's representative, in executive session pursuant to sec-
tion 74-206(1)(a), Idaho Code, a ranking of the applicants, and the gov-
ernor shall appoint the state public defender from the list, with the
advice and consent of the senate. The governor and the office of the
state public defender may assist the panel in drawing the largest pool
of qualified applicants.
(c) Once the governor appoints the state public defender, the panel
shall disband until reconstituted by the governor consistent with this
section.
(7) When the state public defender's term expires under the law, the
governor may reappoint the state public defender to subsequent four (4) year
terms, with the advice and consent of the senate, or the governor may con-
stitute a panel consistent with subsection (6) of this section to nominate
candidates and appoint a state public defender from the list produced by the
panel, with the advice and consent of the senate.
(8) The state public defender shall be compensated in an amount deter-
mined by the governor.
SECTION 10. That Section 44-2602, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
44-2602. DEFINITIONS. (1) As used in this chapter the following terms
have the following meanings:
(a) "Ballot proposition" includes initiatives, referenda, proposed
constitutional amendments, and any other items submitted to the voters
for their approval or rejection.


(b) "Filing entity" means a candidate, officeholder, political commit-
tee, political party, and each other entity required to report contri-
butions under chapter 66, title 67 chapter 3, title 74, Idaho Code.
(c) "Fund" means the separate segregated fund established by a labor
organization for political purposes according to the procedures and re-
quirements of this chapter.
(d)(i) "Labor organization" means any association or organi-
zation of employees, and any agency, employee representation
committee, or plan in which employees participate that exists, in
whole or in part, to advocate on behalf of employees about griev-
ances, labor disputes, wages, rates of pay, hours of employment or
conditions of employment.
(ii) Except as provided in subsection (1)(d)(iii) of this sec-
tion, "labor organization" includes each employee association and
union for employees of public and private sector employers.
(iii) "Labor organization" does not include organizations gov-
erned by the national labor relations act, 29 U.S.C. section 151,
et seq. or the railway labor act, 45 U.S.C. section 151, et seq.
(e) "Political activities" means electoral activities, independent
expenditures, or expenditures made to any candidate, political party,
political action committee or political issues committee or in support
of or against any ballot measure.
(f) "Union dues" means dues, fees or other moneys required as a condi-
tion of membership in a labor organization.
(2) Other terms defined in chapter 66, title 67 chapter 3, title 74,
Idaho Code, apply to this chapter.
SECTION 11. That Section 44-2605, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
44-2605. REGISTRATION -- DISCLOSURE. Each fund established by a labor
organization under this chapter shall:
(1) Register as a political committee as required by chapter 66, title
67 chapter 3, title 74, Idaho Code; and
(2) File the financial reports for political committees required by
chapter 66, title 67 chapter 3, title 74, Idaho Code.
SECTION 12. That Section 50-2006, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
50-2006. URBAN RENEWAL AGENCY -- AUTHORIZATION -- DISSOLUTION.
(1)(a) There is hereby created in each municipality an independent pub-
lic body corporate and politic to be known as the "urban renewal agency"
that was created by resolution as provided in section 50-2005, Idaho
Code, before July 1, 2011, for the municipality; provided, that such
agency shall not transact any business or exercise its powers hereunder
until or unless the local governing body has made the findings pre-
scribed in section 50-2005, Idaho Code.
(b) An urban renewal agency created after July 1, 2011, shall not trans-
act any business or exercise its powers provided for in this chapter
until a majority of qualified electors, voting in a citywide or coun-


tywide election, depending on the municipality in which such agency is
created, vote to authorize such agency to transact business and exer-
cise its powers provided for in this chapter. If prior to July 1, 2011,
the local governing body has made the findings prescribed in paragraph
(a) of this subsection, then such agency shall transact business and
shall exercise its powers hereunder and is not subject to the require-
ments of this paragraph.
(2) Upon satisfaction of the requirements under subsection (1) of this
section, the urban renewal agency is authorized to transact the business and
exercise the powers hereunder by a board of commissioners to be established
as follows:
(a) Unless provided otherwise in this section, the mayor, by and with
the advice and consent of the local governing body, shall appoint a
board of commissioners of the urban renewal agency, which shall consist
of not less than three (3) commissioners nor more than nine (9) commis-
sioners. In the order of appointment, the mayor shall designate the
number of commissioners to be appointed, and the term of each, provided
that the original term of office of no more than two (2) commissioners
shall expire in the same year. The commissioners shall serve for terms
not to exceed five (5) years, from the date of appointment, except that
all vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term.
(b) For inefficiency or neglect of duty or misconduct in office, a com-
missioner may be removed by a majority vote of the local governing body
only after a hearing and after he shall have been given a copy of the
charges at least ten (10) days prior to such hearing and have had an op-
portunity to be heard in person or by counsel. Any commission position
that becomes vacant at a time other than the expiration of a term shall
be filled by the mayor or chair of the board of county commissioners, if
that is the local governing body, by and with the advice and consent of
the local governing body, including the mayor, if applicable, and shall
be filled for the unexpired term.
(c) By enactment of an ordinance, the local governing body may appoint
and designate, from among its members, members of the board of commis-
sioners of the urban renewal agency, provided that such representation
shall be less than a majority of the board of commissioners of the urban
renewal agency of the members of the local governing body on and after
July 1, 2017, in which case all the rights, powers, duties, privileges,
and immunities vested by the urban renewal law of 1965, and as amended,
in an appointed board of commissioners, shall be vested in the local
governing body, which shall, in all respects when acting as an urban re-
newal agency, be acting as an arm of state government, entirely separate
and distinct from the municipality, to achieve, perform, and accomplish
the public purposes prescribed and provided by said urban renewal law of
1965, and as amended.
(d) By enactment of an ordinance, the local governing body may termi-
nate the appointed board of commissioners and thereby appoint and des-
ignate itself as the board of commissioners of the urban renewal agency
for not more than one (1) calendar year.
(e) By enactment of an ordinance, the local governing body may provide
that the board of commissioners of the urban renewal agency shall be


elected at an election held for such purpose on one (1) of the November
dates provided in section 34-106, Idaho Code, and the ordinance may pro-
vide term limits for the commissioners. In this case, all the rights,
powers, duties, privileges, and immunities vested by the urban renewal
law of 1965, and as amended, in an appointed board of commissioners,
shall be vested in the elected board of commissioners of the urban
renewal agency, which shall, in all respects when acting as an urban re-
newal agency, be acting as an arm of state government, entirely separate
and distinct from the municipality, to achieve, perform, and accomplish
the public purposes prescribed and provided by said urban renewal law
of 1965, and as amended. The provisions of chapter 66, title 67 chapter
3, title 74, Idaho Code, shall apply to elected commissioners, and the
county election law shall apply to the person running for commissioner
as if the person were running for county commissioner. In the event of a
vacancy in an elected commissioner position, the replacement shall be
appointed by the mayor or chair of the board of county commissioners, if
that is the local governing body, by and with the advice and consent of
the local governing body, and shall be filled for the unexpired term.
(3) In all instances, a member of the board of commissioners of the ur-
ban renewal agency must be a resident of the county where the urban renewal
agency is located or is doing business.
(4) A commissioner shall receive no compensation for his services but
shall be entitled to the necessary expenses, including travel expenses, in-
curred in the discharge of his duties. Each commissioner shall hold office
until his successor has been appointed and has qualified. A certificate of
the appointment or reappointment of any commissioner shall be filed with the
clerk of the municipality and such certificate shall be conclusive evidence
of the due and proper appointment of such commissioner.
(5)(a) The powers of an urban renewal agency shall be exercised by the
commissioners thereof. A majority of the commissioners shall consti-
tute a quorum for the purpose of conducting business and exercising the
powers of the agency and for all other purposes. Action may be taken by
the agency upon a vote of a majority of the commissioners present, un-
less in any case the bylaws shall require a larger number.
(b) The commissioners shall elect the chairman, cochairman, or vice
chairman for a term of one (1) year from among their members. An agency
may employ an executive director, technical experts, and such other
agents and employees, permanent and temporary, as it may require, and
determine their qualifications, duties, and compensation. For such
legal service as it may require, an agency may employ or retain its own
counsel and legal staff.
(c) An agency authorized to transact business and exercise powers un-
der this chapter shall file, with the local governing body, on or be-
fore March 31 of each year a report of its activities for the preced-
ing calendar year, which report shall include the financial data and au-
dit reports required under sections 67-1075 and 67-1076, Idaho Code.
The agency shall be required to hold a public meeting to report these
findings and take comments from the public. At the time of filing the
report, the agency shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation
in the community a notice to the effect that such report has been filed


with the municipality and the state controller and that the report is
available for inspection during business hours in the office of the city
clerk or county recorder, in the office of the agency, and at all times
on the website of the state controller.
(d) An urban renewal agency shall have the same fiscal year as a mu-
nicipality and shall be subject to the same audit requirements as a mu-
nicipality. An urban renewal agency shall be required to prepare and
file with its local governing body an annual financial report and shall
prepare, approve, and adopt an annual budget for filing with the local
governing body, for informational purposes. A budget means an annual
estimate of revenues and expenses for the following fiscal year of the
agency.
(6) An urban renewal agency shall comply with the public records law
pursuant to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, open meetings law pursuant to
chapter 2, title 74, Idaho Code, the ethics in government law pursuant to
chapter 4, title 74, Idaho Code, and the competitive bidding provisions of
chapter 28, title 67, Idaho Code.
(7) A local governing body that has created an urban renewal agency may
dissolve the urban renewal agency by the enactment of an ordinance as pro-
vided in this subsection. Before such local governing body may dissolve an
urban renewal agency, it shall adopt a resolution of intent to dissolve the
urban renewal agency, which resolution shall be transmitted to the urban re-
newal agency. Upon the adoption of the resolution of intent to dissolve,
the urban renewal agency shall no longer have any authority to initiate any
new urban renewal projects or to take on any additional financial obliga-
tions other than such obligations as are necessary to wind down its affairs.
The local governing body and the board of commissioners of the urban renewal
agency shall then participate in a joint meeting to discuss dissolution. If
following the joint meeting the local governing body of an authorized munic-
ipality makes a finding that there no longer exists a need for the urban re-
newal agency in the municipality, the local governing body shall provide, by
ordinance, for a dissolution of the agency. The ordinance shall be effec-
tive upon publication. The ordinance shall be recorded in the real property
records of the county in which the agency operated. The local governing body
shall transmit a copy of the recorded dissolution ordinance to the urban re-
newal agency, the county clerk, and the state tax commission within ten (10)
business days of the recording date. Upon dissolution of the urban renewal
agency, title to all property of the urban renewal agency shall revert to the
municipality.
SECTION 13. That Section 67-5282, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-5282. DUTIES AND PROHIBITED CONDUCT OF THE CHIEF ADMINISTRATIVE
LAW JUDGE. (1) The chief administrative law judge shall:
(a) Serve as the administrator of the office of administrative hear-
ings;
(b) Conduct such contested case proceedings and such other proceedings
as are conducted by the office of administrative hearings in accordance
with section 67-5280(2)(a) and (b), Idaho Code;


(c) Devote full-time to the office of administrative hearings and his
obligations as chief administrative law judge;
(d) Subject to applicable law and regulation, appoint, supervise, and
remove administrative law judges and staff as he deems appropriate to
the proper functioning of the office of administrative hearings, deter-
mine the duties of such appointees as he deems appropriate, and, from
among the administrative law judges employed by the office of adminis-
trative hearings, designate a deputy chief administrative law judge to
act in place of the chief administrative law judge when the chief admin-
istrative law judge is unable to perform his duties;
(e) Have the authority to promulgate rules, pursuant to the provisions
of this chapter, to implement sections 67-5280 through 67-5286, Idaho
Code;
(f) Establish a hearing officer code of conduct that shall, among other
things, provide for independent and unbiased decision-making by hear-
ing officers both as perceived and in fact and provide for a system to
monitor compliance with, and sanction violations of, the hearing offi-
cer code of conduct;
(g) Protect and ensure the decisional independence of administrative
law judges and independent contractor hearing officers;
(h) Implement a system for monitoring the quality of contested case
proceedings and such other proceedings as are conducted by the office of
administrative hearings in accordance with section 67-5280(2)(a) and
(b), Idaho Code;
(i) At his discretion, unless otherwise prohibited by state or federal
law, retain independent contractor hearing officers at reasonable and
consistent rates of compensation; provided that an independent con-
tractor hearing officer with specialized expertise may be compensated
at a higher rate if such expertise is necessary to the proper adjudica-
tion of the case and such higher rate of compensation is necessary in
order to obtain such expertise; and
(j) Contract with agencies to conduct such adjudicatory hearings, me-
diations, and arbitrations authorized by section 67-5280(2)(b), Idaho
Code.
(2) The chief administrative law judge shall not:
(a) Engage in the practice of law outside of his role in the office of
administrative hearings, except for the practice of law that is permit-
ted for a judge by the Idaho code of judicial conduct and is not incon-
sistent with the code of conduct or his duties as chief administrative
law judge;
(b) Hold, or be a candidate for, any federal, state, county, municipal,
district, or other elective office;
(c) Serve as the agent, representative, officer, political treasurer,
or employee, whether for profit or otherwise, of any political party,
political committee, or candidate as defined in either chapter 1, title
34 or chapter 66, title 67 chapter 3, title 74, Idaho Code, or otherwise;
and
(d) Hold any other public or private-sector position, whether for
profit or otherwise, except for volunteer or adjunct faculty positions


that are not inconsistent with his duties as chief administrative law
judge.
SECTION 14. That Section 72-1503, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
72-1503. POLITICAL ACTIVITIES PROHIBITED. No person may serve on the
commission who is a candidate for political office as the term "candidate"
is defined in section 67-6602 74-3-102, Idaho Code. In the event a person
serving on the commission becomes a candidate, a vacancy on the commission
shall be declared by the secretary of state, and filled as provided by law.
SECTION 15. That Chapter 66, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 16. APPLICABILITY. Any person already registered with the sec-
retary of state prior to July 1, 2026, shall bring his reports into compli-
ance with the provisions of this act by no later than the date on which the
person's next annual report is due.
SECTION 17. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.